District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1221.33

Composition; compensation, procedure; sunset.

Repealed.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-190, § 4, 53 DCR 6791
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 251, 62 DCR 1884
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 251 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 251 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).